Wyoming, session 2025, HB0071.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 26-13-401 through 26-13-404 are
created to read:

ARTICLE 4
INSURANCE FRAUD REPORTING

HB0071

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0206
26-13-401. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Insurance fraud" means an act or omission
committed by a person who knowingly and with intent to
defraud commits or conceals any material information by
presenting, causing to be presented or preparing with
knowledge or belief that it will be presented to or by an
insurer, a reinsurer, a broker or its agent false
information as part of, in support of or concerning a fact
material to one (1) or more of the following:

(A) An application for the issuance of, or
the rating of, an insurance policy for personal or
commercial insurance;

(B) A claim for payment or other benefit
pursuant to an insurance policy for commercial or personal
insurance that the person knows to contain materially false
information concerning any fact material thereto or
conceals, for the purpose of misleading, information
concerning any fact material thereto.
HB0071

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0206

26-13-402. Requirement to report insurance fraud.

A person who engages in or conducts the business of
insurance in this state who knows or has reason to believe
that insurance fraud is being, will be or has been
committed by another person shall report the insurance
fraud or suspected insurance fraud to the commissioner in
the manner prescribed by rule of the commissioner not later
than sixty (60) days after discovering the insurance fraud
or suspected insurance fraud.

26-13-403. Requirement to fully cooperate with
investigations of insurance fraud.

A person who engages in or conducts the business of
insurance in this state shall fully cooperate with the
commissioner in any investigation of insurance fraud or
suspected insurance fraud by providing the commissioner the
information required by and in the manner prescribed by the
commissioner, subject to all confidentiality requirements
that would otherwise apply to the information under law.

HB0071

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0206
26-13-404. Immunity from civil liability.

In the absence of malice, a person who engages in or
conducts the business of insurance in this state shall not
be subject to civil liability for reporting insurance fraud
or suspected insurance fraud to the commissioner pursuant
to W.S. 26-13-402 or for cooperating with the commissioner
in any investigation of insurance fraud or suspected
insurance fraud pursuant to W.S. 26-13-403. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to limit a person's immunity
from liability under W.S. 26-2-131(b).

Section 2. The department of insurance shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0071

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0206
Section 3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0071